Missouri, session 2026, SB1552.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 386, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 386.1000, to read as
follows:
386.1000. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Electrical corporation", the same as defined in
section 386.020;
(3) "Electric service interruption", an interruption
in electric service to a customer if such electric service
interruption was not caused by a customer;
(4) "Loss", any financial loss a customer incurs as a
result of an electric service interruption, including, but
not limited to, food, medicine, or any other good;
(5) "Rate", the same as defined in section 386.020.
2. Whenever an electric service interruption occurs
that lasts for more than forty-eight hours, and a customer
incurs a loss as a result of such electric service

SB 1552 2
interruption, an electrical corporation shall reimburse the
customer for the loss from the electric service interruption.
3. An electrical corporation shall create a form for
loss recovery and make the form available on the electrical
corporation's website.
4. If a loss is greater than two hundred dollars, a
customer shall submit receipts or any relevant documents for
such loss with the form as provided in subsection 3 of this
section to the electrical corporation before being
reimbursed for the loss by the electrical corporation.
5. The commission shall require an electrical
corporation to maintain a record detailing each instance a
transmission of electricity is less than fifty percent of
the standard voltage or whenever an electric service
interruption affects more than ten customers. The record
shall not include disconnection of service to customers for
good cause. The record shall include:
(1) Date, time, and duration of an electric service
interruption;
(2) Number of customers affected by an electric
service interruption;
(3) Description of the cause of an electric service
interruption, including any equipment involved in the
electric service interruption, if applicable;
(4) The geographic area of an electric service
interruption;
(5) Measures taken by an electrical corporation to
restore electric service;
(6) Measures taken by an electrical corporation to
prevent future electric service interruptions; and

SB 1552 3
(7) Amounts paid by an electrical corporation to
affected customers for any loss incurred as a result of an
electric service interruption.
6. Copies of any records detailing the information
required in subsection 5 of this section shall be made
public by an electrical corporation on the electrical
corporation's website.
7. The commission shall promulgate rules to ensure
compliance with provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓